California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 year shall be made to each hospital no later than 60 days after the issuance of the tentative disproportionate share hospital list for that project year and shall include the interim payment amounts for all prior months in the project year. Subsequent interim payments for a project year shall be made on the last checkwrite of each month made by the Controller until interim payments for the first five months of the project year have been made.

(4) The department may recover any interim payments for a project year made under this subdivision to a hospital that is not on the final disproportionate share hospital list for that project year. These interim payments shall be considered an overpayment. The department shall issue a demand for repayment to a hospital at least 30 days prior to taking action to recover the overpayment. After the 30-day period, the department may recover the overpayment using any of the methods set forth in Section 14115.5
 or subdivision (c) of Section 14172.5. Any offset shall be subject to Section 14115.5 or subdivision (d) of Section 14172.5. No other provision of Section 14172.5 shall be applicable with respect to the recovery of overpayments under this subdivision. A hospital may appeal the department’s determination of an overpayment under this subdivision pursuant to the appeal procedures set forth in Sections 51016 to 51047, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and seek judicial review of the final administrative decision pursuant to Section 14171, provided that the only issues that may be raised in this appeal are whether the hospital, but for inadvertent error by the department, was on the final disproportionate share list for the project year and whether the department’s computation of the overpayment amount is correct. If the hospital is reinstated on the final disproportionate share list pursuant to Section 14105.98, the department shall promptly refund any amount recovered under this
 paragraph.

(e) Tentative adjusted monthly payments shall be made for the months of December through March of each project year to each private hospital identified on the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, computed and paid as follows:

(1) An adjusted payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the sum of the total payment adjustment amount for the hospital computed pursuant to subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, plus the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount computed pursuant to subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, each as most recently computed by the department, plus any applicable interim estimated stabilization funding pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14166.14.

(2) A tentative adjusted monthly payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal
 to the adjusted payment amount for the hospital, minus the aggregate interim payments made to the hospital for the project year, divided by seven.

(3) The computation of tentative adjusted monthly payments described in this subdivision shall be made promptly after the department issues the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year.

(4) The first tentative adjusted monthly payment for a project year shall be made to each hospital by January 15 or within 60 days after the issuance of the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, whichever is later, and shall include the tentative adjusted monthly payment amounts for all prior months in the project year for which those payments are due. Subsequent tentative adjusted monthly payments for a project year shall be made on the last checkwrite of each month made by the Controller until tentative
 adjusted monthly payments for December through March of the project year have been made.

(f) Three data corrected payments shall be made on the last checkwrite of the month made by the Controller for the months of April through June of each project year to each private hospital identified on the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, computed and paid as follows:

(1) An annual data corrected payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the sum of the total payment adjustment amount for the hospital computed pursuant to subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, plus the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount computed pursuant to subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, each as most recently computed by the department, plus any interim estimated stabilization funding. The annual data corrected payment amounts shall reflect data corrections,
 hospital closures, and other revisions made by the department to the adjusted payment amounts computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(2) A monthly data corrected payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the annual data corrected payment amount for the hospital, minus both the aggregate interim payments made to the hospital for the project year and the aggregate tentative adjusted monthly payments made to the hospital, divided by three.

(g) Payment under subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) for a month shall be made only to private hospitals open for patient care through the 15th day of the month.

(h) The department shall compute a final adjusted payment amount for each private hospital on the final disproportionate share list for a project year after the completion of the project year and the
 determination of the amount of stabilization funding available to be paid under this section as follows:

(1) An amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the sum of the total payment adjustment amount for the hospital computed pursuant to subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, plus the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount computed pursuant to subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, each as most recently computed by the department. These amounts shall reflect data corrections, hospital closures, and other revisions made by the department to the annual data corrected payment amounts computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) in a manner that ensures that any payments not payable or recouped are redistributed among hospitals eligible for a final adjusted payment amount in accordance with the calculations made pursuant to Section 14105.98.

(2) The department
 shall add to the amount computed for each hospital under paragraph (1) a pro rata share of any stabilization funding to be allocated and paid under this section, allocated based on the amounts computed under paragraph (1).

(3) The department shall for each hospital for each project year reconcile the total amount paid to the hospital for that project year under subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) with the amount determined under paragraph (2). The department shall issue a report to each hospital setting forth the result of the reconciliation that shall include the department’s computation, data, and identification of data sources. The department shall pay to the hospital any underpayment determined as a result of this reconciliation and collect from the hospital any overpayment determined as a result of this reconciliation pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d).

(4) A hospital
 may seek to correct the department’s data and computations under this section in accordance with the processes undertaken by the department to implement Section 14105.98 in effect during the 2004–05 state fiscal year.

(i) In accordance with the demonstration project, the following shall apply:

(1) Payments under this section shall satisfy the state’s obligation to have a payment adjustment program for disproportionate share hospitals under Section 1923 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-4).

(2) Payments under this section and federal financial participation shall not be counted against the state’s allotment of federal funding for Medicaid disproportionate share payment adjustments.

(j) (1) For purposes of this
 subdivision, “federal disproportionate share allotment” means the federal Medicaid disproportionate share hospital allotment specified for California under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) In the event any hospital, or any party on behalf of a hospital, shall initiate a case or proceeding in any state or federal court in which the hospital seeks any relief of any sort whatsoever, including, but not limited to, monetary relief, injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or a writ, based in whole or in part on a contention that the hospital is entitled to, or should receive any portion of, the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment for any or all of federal fiscal years 2006 to 2010, inclusive, all of the following shall apply:

(A) No payments shall be made to the hospital pursuant to this section until the case or proceeding is finally resolved,
 including the final disposition of all appeals.

(B) Any amount computed to be payable to the hospital pursuant to this section for a project year shall be withheld by the department and shall be paid to the hospital only after the case or proceeding is finally resolved, including the final disposition of all appeals, and only if the case or proceeding does not result in any amount being paid or payable to the hospital from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment for any portion of the project year.

(C) The hospital shall become ineligible to receive any amount pursuant to this section for any project year for which it is determined that the hospital is entitled to be paid any portion of the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(D) Any amount that would have been payable to the hospital
 pursuant to this section, but is not paid to the hospital because the hospital has become ineligible to receive payments pursuant to this section shall be returned to the state General Fund.

(E) In the event any portion of the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment is applied to payments to any private hospital, the department shall make any additional payments that may be necessary from state funds so that the amount of the disproportionate share hospital payments that are made to designated public hospitals or nondesignated public hospitals is not less than the amount that would have been made if the allotment had not been applied to payments to any private hospital.

(F) A hospital’s total project year payment amount determined under this section may be subject to reduction by offset pursuant to Section 14115.5 or 14172.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 327, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.115.

(a) Due to the state budget deficit and in order to implement changes in the level of funding for health care services, the department shall reduce disproportionate share hospital replacement payments to private hospitals made pursuant to Section 14166.11 as specified in this section.

(b) (1) Disproportionate share
 hospital replacement payments to private hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.11 shall be reduced by 10 percent. The reductions shall be applied to all disproportionate share hospital replacement payments to private hospitals made for the 2009–10 fiscal year, including, but not limited to, interim payments, tentative adjusted monthly payments, data corrected payments, and the final adjusted payment.

(2) Disproportionate share hospital replacement payments to private hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.11 shall be reduced in the 2010–11 fiscal year by thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in General Fund moneys and by the corresponding federal financial participation. To the extent permitted by federal law, the additional room created by this paragraph under the federal upper payment limit shall be used to increase supplemental payments under Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1) and Article 5.227 (commencing with Section 14168.31).

(3) Disproportionate share hospital replacement payments to private hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.11 shall be reduced in the 2011–12 fiscal year by seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in General Fund moneys and by the corresponding federal financial participation. To the extent permitted by federal law, the additional room created by this paragraph under the federal upper payment limit shall be used to increase supplemental payments under legislation extending or creating a new supplemental hospital payment program supported by a fee.

(4) Disproportionate share hospital replacement payments to private hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.11 shall be reduced in the 2012–13 fiscal year by ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) in General Fund moneys and by the corresponding federal financial participation.

(5) Disproportionate share hospital replacement payments to private hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.11 shall be reduced in the 2013–14 fiscal year by five million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($5,250,000) in General Fund moneys and by the corresponding federal financial participation.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(d) The reductions described in this section shall apply only to payments for services when the General Fund share of the payment is paid with funds appropriated to the department in the annual Budget Act.

(e) The department shall promptly
 seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.12.

(a) The California Medical Assistance Commission shall negotiate payment amounts, in accordance with the selective provider contracting program established pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), from the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b) for distribution to private hospitals that satisfy the criteria of subdivision (s). Pursuant to Section
 14165, on and after July 1, 2012, the Director of Health Care Services shall exercise the discretion granted to the California Medical Assistance Commission.

(b) The Private Hospital Supplemental Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. For purposes of this section, “fund” means the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in this section.

(d) Except as otherwise limited by this section, the fund shall consist of all of the following:

(1) One hundred eighteen million four hundred thousand dollars ($118,400,000), which shall be transferred annually from General Fund amounts appropriated in the annual
 Budget Act for the Medi-Cal program, except as follows:

(A) For the 2008–09 fiscal year, this amount shall be reduced by thirteen million six hundred thousand dollars ($13,600,000) and by an amount equal to one-half of the difference between eighteen million three hundred thousand dollars ($18,300,000) and the amount of any reduction in the additional payments for distressed hospitals calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20.

(B) For the 2012–13 fiscal year, this amount shall be reduced by seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars ($17,500,000).

(C) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, this amount shall be reduced by eight million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($8,750,000).

(2) Any additional
 moneys appropriated to the fund.

(3) All stabilization funding transferred to the fund pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.14.

(4) Any moneys that any county, other political subdivision of the state, or other governmental entity in the state may elect to transfer to the department for deposit into the fund, as permitted under Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or any other applicable federal Medicaid laws.

(5) All private moneys donated by private individuals or entities to the department for deposit in the fund as permitted under applicable federal Medicaid laws.

(6) Any interest that accrues on amounts in the fund.

(e) Any public
 agency transferring moneys to the fund may, for that purpose, utilize any revenues, grants, or allocations received from the state for health care programs or purposes, unless otherwise prohibited by law. A public agency may also utilize its general funds or any other public moneys or revenues for purposes of transfers to the fund, unless otherwise prohibited by law.

(f) The department may accept or not accept moneys offered to the department for deposit in the fund. If the department accepts moneys pursuant to this section, the department shall obtain federal financial participation to the full extent permitted by law. With respect to funds transferred or donated from private individuals or entities, the department shall accept only those funds that are certified by the transferring or donating entity that qualify for federal financial participation under the terms of the Medicaid Voluntary Contribution and Provider-Specific Tax Amendments of
 1991 (Public Law 102-234) or Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as applicable. The department may return any funds transferred or donated in error.

(g) Moneys in the fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of payments to hospitals under this section.

(h) Any funds remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward for use in the following fiscal year.

(i) Moneys shall be allocated from the fund by the department and shall be applied to obtain federal financial participation in accordance with customary Medi-Cal accounting procedures for purposes of payments under this section. Distributions from the fund shall be supplemental to any other Medi-Cal reimbursement received by the hospitals, including amounts that hospitals receive under the selective
 provider contracting program (Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081)), and shall not affect provider rates paid under the selective provider contracting program.

(j) Each private hospital that was a private hospital during the 2002–03 fiscal year, received payments for the 2002–03 fiscal year from any of the prior supplemental funds, and, during the project year, satisfies the criteria in subdivision (s) to be eligible to negotiate for distributions under any of those sections, shall receive no less from the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund for the project year than 100 percent of the amount the hospital received from the prior supplemental funds for the 2002–03 fiscal year. Each private hospital described in this subdivision shall be eligible for additional payments from the fund pursuant to subdivision (k).

(k) All amounts that are in the fund for a project year in excess
 of the amount necessary to make the payments under subdivision (j) shall be available for negotiation by the California Medical Assistance Commission, along with corresponding federal financial participation, for supplemental payments to private hospitals, which for the project year satisfy the criteria under subdivision (s) to be eligible to negotiate for distributions under any of those sections, and paid for services rendered during the project year pursuant to the selective provider contracting program established under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(l) The amount of any stabilization funding transferred to the fund, or the amount of intergovernmental transfers deposited to the fund pursuant to subdivision (o), together with the associated federal reimbursement, with respect to a particular project year, may, in the discretion of the California Medical Assistance Commission, until its dissolution on June 30, 2012, be paid for
 services furnished in the same project year regardless of when the stabilization funds or intergovernmental transfer funds, and the associated federal reimbursement, become available, provided the payment is consistent with other applicable federal or state law requirements and does not result in a hospital exceeding any applicable reimbursement limitations. On and after July 1, 2012, the Director of Health Care Services shall exercise the discretion granted to the California Medical Assistance Commission by this subdivision.

(m) The department shall pay amounts due to a private hospital from the fund for a project year, with the exception of stabilization funding, in up to four installment payments, unless otherwise provided in the hospital’s contract negotiated with the California Medical Assistance Commission, except that hospitals that are not described in subdivision (j) shall not receive the first installment payment. The first payment
 shall be made as soon as practicable after the issuance of the tentative disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, and in no event later than January 1 of the project year. The second and subsequent payments shall be made after the issuance of the final disproportionate hospital list for the project year, and shall be made only to hospitals that are on the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year. The second payment shall be made by February 1 of the project year or as soon as practicable after the issuance of the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year. The third payment, if scheduled, shall be made by April 1 of the project year. The fourth payment, if scheduled, shall be made by June 30 of the project year. This subdivision does not apply to hospitals that are scheduled to receive payments from the fund because they meet the criteria under paragraph (2) of subdivision (s) and do not meet the criteria under paragraph (1), (3), or (4) of
 subdivision (s), which shall be paid in accordance with the applicable contract or contract amendment negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission.

(n) The department shall pay stabilization funding transferred to the fund in amounts negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission and shall pay the scheduled payments in accordance with the applicable contract or contract amendment.

(o) Payments to private hospitals that are eligible to receive payments pursuant to subdivision (s) may be made using funds transferred from governmental entities to the state, at the option of the governmental entity. Any payments funded by intergovernmental transfers shall remain with the private hospital and shall not be transferred back to any unit of government. An amount equal to 25 percent of the amount of any intergovernmental transfer made in the project year that
 results in a supplemental payment made for the same project year to a project year private DSH hospital designated by the governmental entity that made the intergovernmental transfer shall be deposited in the fund for distribution as determined by the California Medical Assistance Commission. An amount equal to 75 percent shall be deposited in the fund and distributed to the private hospitals designated by the governmental entity.

(p) A private hospital that receives payment pursuant to this section for a particular project year shall not submit a notice for the termination of its participation in the selective provider contracting program established pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) until the later of the following dates:

(1) On or after December 31 of the next project year.

(2) The date
 specified in the hospital’s contract, if applicable.

(q) (1) For the 2007–08, 2008–09, and 2009–10 project years, the County of Los Angeles shall make intergovernmental transfers to the state to fund the nonfederal share of increased Medi-Cal payments to those private hospitals that serve the South Los Angeles population formerly served by Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital. The intergovernmental transfers required under this subdivision shall be funded by county tax revenues and shall total five million dollars ($5,000,000) per project year, except that, in the event that the director determines that any amount is due to the County of Los Angeles under the demonstration project for services rendered during the portion of a project year during which Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital was operational, the amount of intergovernmental transfers required under this subdivision
 shall be reduced by a percentage determined by reducing 100 percent by the percentage reduction in Los Angeles County Martin Luther King, Jr.-Harbor Hospital’s baseline, as determined under subdivision (c) of Section 14166.5 for that project year.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (o), an amount equal to 100 percent of the county’s intergovernmental transfers under this subdivision shall be deposited in the fund and, within 30 days after receipt of the intergovernmental transfer, shall be distributed, together with related federal financial participation, to the private hospitals designated by the county in the amounts designated by the county. The director shall disregard amounts received pursuant to this subdivision in calculating the OBRA 1993 payment limitation, as defined in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, for purposes of determining the amount of disproportionate share hospital replacement payments due a private
 hospital under Section 14166.11.

(r) (1) The reductions in supplemental payments under this section that result from the reductions in the amounts transferred from the General Fund to the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund for the 2012–13 and 2013–14 fiscal years under subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall be allocated equally in the aggregate between children’s hospitals eligible for supplemental payments under this section and other hospitals eligible for supplemental payments under this section. When negotiating payment amounts to a hospital under this section for the 2012–13 and 2013–14 fiscal years, the California Medical Assistance Commission, or its successor agency, shall identify both a payment amount that would have been made absent the funding reductions in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) and the payment amount that will be made taking into account the
 funding reductions under subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d). For purposes of this subdivision, “children’s hospital” shall have the meaning set forth in paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(2) This subdivision shall not preclude the department from including some or all of the reductions under this section within the payments made under a new diagnosis-related group payment methodology for the 2012–13 fiscal year or the 2013–14 fiscal year. In the event the department includes some or all of the amounts, including reductions, within the payments made under a new diagnosis-related group payment methodology for the 2012–13 fiscal year or the 2013–14 fiscal year, the department, in implementing the reductions in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), shall, to the extent feasible, utilize the allocation specified in paragraph (1).

(s) In order
 for a hospital to receive distributions pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), the hospital shall satisfy the eligibility criteria in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subdivision.

(1) The hospital meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(B) The hospital meets the criteria contained in the Medicaid State Plan for disproportionate share hospital status.

(C) The hospital is one of the following:

(i) A licensed provider of basic emergency services as described in Section 70411 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) A licensed provider of comprehensive emergency medical services as defined in Section 70451 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(iii) A children’s hospital, as defined in Section 14087.21, that satisfies clause (i) or (ii), or that jointly provides basic or comprehensive emergency services in conjunction with another licensed hospital.

(iv) A hospital owned and operated by a public agency that operates two or more hospitals that qualify under subparagraph (A) or (B) with respect to the particular state fiscal year.

(v) A hospital designated by the National Cancer Institute as a comprehensive or clinical cancer research center that primarily treats acutely ill cancer patients and that is exempt from the federal Medicare prospective payment system pursuant to Section 1886(d)(1)(B)(v) of
 the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v)).

(D) The hospital is able to demonstrate a purpose for additional funding under the selective provider contracting program including proposals relating to emergency services and other health care services, including infrequent yet high-cost services, such as anti-AB human antitoxin treatment for infant botulism (human botulinum immune globulin (HBIG), commonly referred to as “Baby-BIG”), that are made available, or will be made available, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) and meets the definition of a university teaching hospital or major, nonuniversity, teaching hospital as set forth on page 51 and as listed on page 57 of the department’s report dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping.” Payments from the fund shall be used solely
 for the purposes identified in the contract between the hospital and the state.

(3) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), and meets the definition of any of the following:

(A) A large teaching emphasis hospital, as set forth on page 51 and listed on page 57 of the department’s report dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping,” and also meets the definition of eligible hospital as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(B) A children’s hospital pursuant to Section 10727, and also meets the definition of eligible hospital as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(C) Notwithstanding the requirement in subparagraph (A) that a hospital must be listed on page
 57 of the department’s report dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping,” any hospital whose license pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code was consolidated during the 1999 calendar year with a large teaching emphasis hospital that is listed on page 57 of the above-described report shall be eligible. All other requirements of paragraph (3) shall continue to apply.

(4) The hospital meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(B) The hospital satisfies the Medicaid State Plan criteria for disproportionate share hospital status.

(C) The hospital is a small and rural hospital as defined in Section 124840 of the Health
 and Safety Code.

(D) The hospital is a licensed provider of standby emergency services as described in Section 70649 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) The hospital is able to demonstrate a purpose for additional funding under the selective provider contracting program with proposals relating to health care services that are made available, or will be made available, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(F) The hospital is determined by the California Medical Assistance Commission to be a hospital that provides an important community service that otherwise would not be provided in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 438, Sec. 21.   (AB 1468)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.125.

(a) Effective the first fiscal year in which reimbursement to private hospitals is provided under the diagnosis-related group methodology established pursuant to Section 14105.28, the director shall allocate the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund among eligible private hospitals pursuant to a methodology developed in consultation with the statewide associations representing children’s hospitals and private DSH hospitals.

(b) Subject to subdivision (a), for the 2013–14 fiscal year only as a transition, this methodology shall, to the extent possible, ensure that each eligible hospital is allocated funding at a proportionate level of payments it received for the 2011–12 fiscal year, taking into consideration applicable eligibility criteria and the amount of funding available in the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund established in Section 14166.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   (SB 920)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.13.

(a) With respect to each project year, the director shall determine a baseline funding amount for each base year private DSH hospital that is also a project year private DSH hospital. A private hospital’s baseline funding amount shall be an amount equal to the total amount paid to the hospital for inpatient hospital services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries during the 2004–05 state fiscal year, including the following Medi-Cal payments, but excluding payments received under the Medi-Cal
 Specialty Mental Health Services Consolidation Program:

(1) Base payments under the selective provider contracting program as provided for under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), or under the Medi-Cal state plan cost reimbursement system for inpatient hospital services for noncontracting hospitals.

(2) Emergency Services and Supplemental Payments Fund payments as provided for under Section 14085.6.

(3) Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund payments and Large Teaching Emphasis Hospital and Children’s Hospital Medi-Cal Medical Education Supplemental Payment Fund payments as provided for under Sections 14085.7 and 14085.8, respectively.

(4) Small and Rural Hospital Supplemental Payments Fund payments as provided for under Section
 14085.9.

(5) Disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments as provided for under Section 14105.98.

(6) Administrative day payments as provided for under Section 51542 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The aggregate project year private DSH hospital baseline funding amount shall be the sum of all baseline funding amounts determined under subdivision (a).

(c) With respect to each project year beginning after the 2005–06 project year, an aggregate project year private DSH hospital adjusted baseline funding amount shall be determined as follows:

(1) The department shall determine the aggregate total Medi-Cal revenue, using amounts determined under subdivision (a),
 for inpatient hospital services rendered during the 2004–05 fiscal year for project year private DSH hospitals, less the total amount of disproportionate share hospital payments identified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) for those hospitals.

(2) The department shall determine the aggregate total Medi-Cal revenue paid or payable for inpatient hospital services rendered during the fiscal year immediately preceding the project year for which the private hospital adjusted baseline funding amount is being calculated for project year private DSH hospitals. The aggregate total revenue for services rendered in the relevant preceding fiscal year shall include the payments described in paragraphs (1) and (6) of subdivision (a), and all other payments made to project year private DSH hospitals under this article, excluding disproportionate share hospital replacement payments made under Section 14166.11, stabilization funding under Section 14166.14,
 and distressed hospital funding under Section 14166.23 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20.

(3) The department shall:

(A) Calculate the difference between the amount determined under paragraph (1) and the amount determined under paragraph (2).

(B) Determine the percentage increase or decrease by dividing the difference in subparagraph (A) by the amount in paragraph (1).

(C) Apply the percentage in subparagraph (B) to the amount determined under paragraph (1).

(4) The aggregate private DSH hospital adjusted baseline funding amount is the amount determined in paragraph (1), plus the amount determined in subparagraph (C), plus the amount in paragraph (5) of subdivision
 (a).

(d) If, with respect to any project year, the difference between the percentage adjustment in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of this section is greater than five percentage points more than the aggregate percentage adjustment for designated public hospitals, excluding the percentage adjustment for any designated public hospital that was not in operation for the full project year, determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14166.5, then the aggregate percentage adjustment for private DSH hospitals shall be reduced in the amount necessary to reduce the difference to five percentage points.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.14.

The amount of any stabilization funding payable to the project year private DSH hospitals under Section 14166.20 for a project year, which amount shall not include the amount of stabilization funding paid or payable to hospitals prior to the computation of the stabilization funding under Section 14166.20, plus any amount payable to project year private DSH hospitals under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section
 14166.21, shall be allocated as follows:

(a) (1) To fund any shortfall due under Section 14166.11.

(2) An amount shall be transferred to the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund established pursuant to Section 14166.12, as may be necessary so that the amount for the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund for the project year, including all funds previously transferred to, or deposited in, the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund for the project year, is not less than the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund base amount determined pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 14166.12.

(3) The amounts paid or transferred under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be reduced pro rata if there is not sufficient funding described under paragraphs (1) and (2).
